Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-137
Certificate of convenience and necessity.

After the commission has lawfully granted an application pursuant
to section 86-136, the telecommunications company ordered to provide the advanced telecommunications capability service
shall be issued a certificate of convenience and necessity to serve that area added to its local exchange area by the commission, if necessary. The commission
shall set the date when the service granted shall take effect and, in doing so,
shall take into consideration any construction or major repair which will
be required of the telecommunications company involved.

Laws 1969, c. 601, § 3, p. 2458;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 110;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 75-614;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 36;

Laws 2012, LB715, § 6.